Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 41.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,357
All-terrain
vehicle; utility-type vehicle; lights
required; when.

Every all-terrain vehicle and utility-type vehicle shall
display a lighted headlight and taillight during the period of time from sunset
to sunrise and at any time when visibility is reduced due to insufficient
light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions.

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2803;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 453;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 50;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 41.